Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.023

Permanent renewal of brands—Heritage brands—Fees.

The director may adopt rules establishing criteria and fees for the permanent renewal of brands registered with the department but renewed as livestock heritage brands. Such heritage brands are not intended for use on livestock.

[ 2003 c 326 s 5; 1998 c 263 s 5.]